Utah statutes.
62A-4a-906.   Termination or modification of adoption assistance.
(1)  Adoption assistance may not be terminated or modified unless the division
has given adoptive parents notice and opportunity for a hearing as required in
Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(2)  Adoption assistance shall be terminated if any of the following occur:
(a)  the adoptive parents request termination;
(b)  the child reaches 18 years of age, unless approval has been given by the
division to continue beyond the age of 18 due to mental or physical
disability, but in no case shall assistance continue after a child reaches 21
years of age;
(c)  the child dies;
(d)  the adoptive parents die;
(e)  the adoptive parent's legal responsibility for the child ceases;
(f)  the state determines that the child is no longer receiving support from
the adoptive parents;
(g)  the child marries; or
(h)  the child enters military service.
